Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1025
Consolidated district; board; members; officers; election.

Immediately following the entry of the order of consolidation by the county board, the members of the boards of districts of the former rural water districts which were consolidated by such order shall meet and elect from among themselves a chairman, vice-chairman, secretary and treasurer. The offices of secretary and treasurer may be held by one person. No more than two of such offices may be held by persons from one of such former rural water districts. The members of such boards shall adopt the bylaws of one of such former districts with such changes and modifications as the directors shall deem necessary. The members of such boards of directors shall continue to serve as members of the board of directors of the consolidated district until the next annual meeting of the consolidated district as fixed by the bylaws, at which time a board of directors, not to exceed nine in number, shall be elected for staggered terms of one, two, and three years in the manner prescribed for the election of an original board under section 46-1016.

Laws 1972, LB 1502, § 6.